Washington statutes.
RCW 35.22.150

Submission of new charter.

Within ten days after the results of the election have been determined, if a majority of the votes cast favor the proceeding, the members of the board of freeholders elected thereat shall convene and prepare a new charter by altering, revising, adding to, or repealing the existing charter including all amendments thereto and within one year thereafter file it with the city clerk.

[ 1974 ex.s. c 1 s 2; 1965 c 7 s 35.22.150. Prior: 1945 c 55 s 1, part; 1925 ex.s. c 137 s 1, part; 1895 c 27 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 8955, part.]

NOTES:

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 1: See note following RCW 35.22.055.